sl-SI: Igralna površina za vratarja: Tla; Led; Rolanje; Ulica; Drugo
pt-BR: Área de jogo do goleiro: Piso; Gelo; Inline; Rua; Outro
fr: Surface de jeu du gardien de but: Plancher; Glace; En ligne; Rue; Autre
sk-SK: Hracia plocha brankára: Podlaha; Ľad; Inline; Ulica; Iné
ru: Игровая поверхность вратаря: Пол; Лед; Роллеркей (инлайн); Улица; Другое
nl: Speelveld keeper: Zaal; IJs; Inline; Straat; Anders
tr: Kaleci oyun zemini: Zemin; Buz; Inline; Sokak; Diğer
nb: Spilleoverflate for målvakt: Gulv; Is; Inline; Gate; Annet
sv: Spelunderlag för målvakt: Golv; Is; Inlines; Street; Annan
da: Målmands spilleoverflade: Gulv; Is; Inline; Gade; Anden
hr-HR: Površina za igru vratara: Pod; Led; Rolanje (Inline); Ulica; Ostalo
es: Superficie de juego del portero: Suelo; Hielo; En línea; Calle; Otra
zh-TW: 守門員比賽場地: 地板; 冰上; 直排輪; 街頭; 其他
ro-RO: Suprafața de joc a portarului: Podea; Gheață; Role; Stradă; Altele
th: พื้นที่หน้าประตู: พื้น; ลานน้ำแข็ง; อินไลน์; พื้นถนน; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 守门员比赛台面: 地板; 冰面; 旱冰; 街头; 其他
cs: Hrací plocha pro brankáře: Povrch; Led; In-line; Ulice; Ostatní
hu: Kapus játékfelülete: Padló; Jég; Inline; Utcai; Egyéb
bg-BG: Игрална повърхност за вратар: Под; Лед; Инлайн; Улица; Друго
de: Torhüterspielfläche: Halle; Eis; Inline; Straße; Andere
pt-PT: Superfície de jogo do guarda-redes: Chão; Gelo; Linha; Rua; Outro
vi: Bề mặt sân thi đấu của thủ môn: Sàn; Băng; Trượt patin; Đường phố; Khác
ja: ゴールキーパープレイ表面: フロア; 氷; インライン; ストリート; その他
en: Goalie playing surface: Floor; Ice; Inline; Street; Other
pl: Powierzchnia gry bramkarza: Podłoga; Lód; Rolki; Ulica; Inna
fi: Maalivahdin pelipinta: Lattia; Jää; Inline; Katu; Muu
el: Επιφάνεια παιχνιδιού τερματοφύλακα: Δάπεδο; Πάγος; Inline; Δρόμος; Άλλο
ko: 골키퍼 호환 경기장 표면: 플로어; 아이스; 인라인; 스트리트; 기타
it: Superficie di gioco del portiere: Pavimento; Ghiaccio; Inline; Strada; Altro
lt-LT: Vartininko žaidimo paviršius: Grindys; Ledas; Riedučiams skirta danga; Gatvė; Kita